libextern/espeak-ng-master/dictsource/af_rules
.group we
          _) web          vEb //webadres/se, webarea etc.
         As) weer (_      ve@r // fix w sound: kusweer/ysweer, etc.
             weder (va    v%e@d@r // move default stress: wedervaar/wedervare/wedervaring/-e/-s
             wee (moedi   v%e@ // move default stress: weemoedig/-e/-heid
             weer (barst  v%e@r // move default stress: weerbarstig/-e/-heid
             weer (lê     v%e@r // move default stress
             weer (leg    v%e@r // move default stress: (on)weerlegbaar
             weer (strew  v%e@r // move default stress: weerstrewig/-e/-heid
          @) wees (_      ve@s // fix w sound: siekwees/volkwees
             weet (gierig v%e@t // move default stress: weetgierig/-e/-heid
          @) weg (_       v&x2 // blindweg/botweg and many similar
      spoor) weg          v&x2 // fix e sound: spoorwegaanleg/-aansluiting/-amptenaar/-eiendom/-inkomste/-ongeluk...
          _) wegge (C@P5  v'&x2@ // prefix: weggeja and similar
          K) weg (o       v&x2_ // fix e sound: gal-/lugwegobstruksie/snelwegoprit/wegoefen...
             weife (l     veIf@ // fix e sound: weifelloos/-lose/-loosheid
          _) weke (C      ve@k@ // fix 2nd e sound: wekelang/-e
             welbehaaglik v%&lb@hA:x2l@k // move default stress: welbehaaglik/-e/-er/-ste
          _) wel (edel    v%&l_ // fix e sound and stress, insert pause: weledel/-e
             welf (_      v&lf // fix e sound: omwelf/oorwelf
          _) wel (op     v&l_ // fix e sound, pause: welopgevoede/-opgeleide, etc.
             wel (skape   v%&l // move default stress: welskape/-nheid
             wel (spreken v%&l // move default stress: welsprekend/-e
          @) wendig       v'End@x2 // inwendig/noodwendig/uitwendig
          &) wene (_      v@n@ // fix penultimate e sound: afgestorwene/-s/ingeskrewene/verdorwene/verhewene
       fees) wens         ve~ns // fix w and e sounds: kersfeeswens/-e
        luk) wens         ve~ns // fix w sound: gelukwens(brief...)/gelukwensing, etc.
          A) wer (AA      v@r // fix e sound: beyweraar/keweruitroeiing/nyweraar/oewereienaar
         ge) were         ve@r@ // fix e sound in compounds ending in gewere
             werk (stelli v%&rk // fix stress: bewerkstellig and derivatives
          t) werk         v&rk // fix w sound: geutwerk/gietwerk/netwerk
             werwel       v&rv@l // fix w and 2nd e sound: werwel and many compounds
          @) wekkend      v'Ek@nt // stress on wekkend at end compounds
             weer (kaats  v%e@r // move default stress: weerkaats/-in
          @) wekkende     v'Ek@nd@ // stress on wekkende at end compounds
          _) we (ll@@     v%& // wellewend/welluidend/wellustig, but wellig/wellus
          _) wel (r       v%&l // move default stress: (on)welriekend
          _) wel (v       v%&l // stress (on)welvoeglik/-e/-heid/welvarend
             wel (vaart   v&l // restore default stress
             wel (wil     v%&l // move default stress: welwillend/-e          
          _) wen (aC      vEn? // wenas/wenakker/opwenaksie
         ne) wens         v@ns // newens/benewens/hierbenewens/daarbenewens
         @C) we (tK       vE // krygswet/verdedigingswetgewing
          s) wed (C       vEt       // toetswedstryd/tenniswedstryd/afloswedloop
          @) wed (str     vEt // fix e sound: buite/foto/rugbywedstryd
          s) wedd (@      vEd       // beroepswedder
             wedywer      vEteIv@r // pronunc. of d and e-sound in derivatives
             weer (hou    v%e@r // exception to default stress rule
          _) weer (sp     ve@r' // weerspreek/weersprekende/weerspreking/weerspannig/weerspieë«l
             weer (staan  v%e@r // weerstaan/onweerstaanbaar
         @C) wering (_    ve@r@N //borswering, diefwering etc.
             werp         v&rp
          @) wesigheid    v'e@s@x2eIt // aanwesigheid/afwesigheid
             weten (C     ve@t@n // wetenskap/-lik/-e and compounds/compounds of geweten-


.group x
             x            ks
             x (x
             xen (o       z%En // xeno-/fiel/-filie/-fobie/-fobies/-e
             xhosa        k''O:sa // (ama)Xhosa/-s; xh click does not yet work

.group y
             y            eI
          %C) y (_        _^_EN // English: Betty/Eddy/Harry/Molly/Penny/Tommy
      skapp) y (_         %eI // compounds like: handels-/versekerings-/verskepingsmaatskappy
             york         j'O:k //new-yorkse and may be others
             ysterre (lin eIst@re@ // fix e sound: ysterreling/-s

.group z
             z            z
             z (z
          t) z            s // fix s sound: britz/fritz/hertz and similar
             zambesi      z%ambe@s%i // fix stress and e sound: Zambesi(rivier)
             zebra        ze@bra // fix vowel sounds: zebra/-strepe

.group 0xce   // Greek letters
// 0xce is the first byte of the utf-8 code for these characters

	α	'alfa_
	ά	'alfa_
	β	b'e@ta_
	γ	g'ama_
	δ	d'&lta_
	ε	'EpsilOn_
	έ	'EpsilOn_
	ζ	z'e@ta_
	η	'e@ta_
	ή	'e@ta_
	θ	T'e@ta_
	ι	i'o@ta_
	ί	i'o@ta_
	κ	k'apa_
	λ	l'ambda_
	μ	m'y:_
	ν	n'y:_
	ξ	ks'i_
	ο	'OmikrOn_

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

	π	p'i_
	ρ	r'o@_
	σ	s'igma_
	ς	s'igma_
	τ	t'aU_
	υ	'upsilOn_
	ύ	'upsilOn_
	φ	f'i_
	χ	x'i_
	ψ	ps'i_
	ω	o@m'e@x2a_
	ώ	o@m'e@x2a_
	ό	'OmikrOn_

.group 
          @) 's (S2       s // plurals of wrds ending in vowels: crescendo's/innuendo's/okapi's, etc.
          @) 'tjie        %ici // foto'tjie/ma'tjie, etc.
          K) á (CK        '!a // extra stress: kán/wás and similar
          C) á (CA        ''A: // always stress long accented a
             áá           '!A: // extra stress: dáár/dáár and similar
             álle (K      '!al@ // ekstra stress: álle/-s
          K) ék (_        '&k // fix e sound and stress: ék/gék
          K) é (CK        '!E // extra stress: hét/nét and similar
             éé           '!e@ // extra stress: één, etdc.
             ék (_        '!&k // ekstra stress: ék/plék
             ə            @       // char.replacement for 'n
         _C) è (_         E // dè/nè
             éú           '!Y@ // stressed syllable

             ê            e:
          l) êer          &:@r // fix ê sound: lêer and compounds
             ê (r         &:
             êr (_        ''&:r // stress at end of wrds ending in êr: arbitrêr/dissiplinêr, etc.
             êre (_       ''&:r@ // stress of penultimate slb of wrds ending in êre: elementêre/dissiplinêre
          b) êre (_       &:r@ // but wrds ending in bêre take default stress: wegbêre
         sk) êr (+        &:r // but wrds containing skêr follow normal stress: skaapskêr
             îe           3:
         ge) ë (rf        & // oorgeëf/-de
             ë (teit      @ // fix stress and e sound: variëteit and compounds
             ïgnoreer     ix2nur'e@r // geïgnoreer
             ïllu (st     %il%W // geïllustreer/-de
             ï (nsp       @ // geïnspireer/-de
             ï (nt        @ // geïnteresseerd
             ï (nC       'I // beïndruk/beïnvloed
             ïnkarn (A    @Nk%arn // fix stress and nk sound: reïnkarnasie and compounds/reïnkarneer
             ïsol         %is%ul // geïsoleer/-d
          K) ó (CK        '!O // extra stress: óf/kón and similar
             óé   '!u // extra stress: móét/sóék and similar
             óó           '!o@ // extra stress: sóós/vóór and similar
             óói          '!oI // extra stress: (n)óóit
             óú           '!@U // extra stress: sóú/wóú
             ô            O:
          K) ú (CK        '!W // extra stress: dús/júl(le) and similar
             ûe           W:@ // brûe/rû
             ý            '!eI // extra stress: jý/mý/sý and similar
             ñ            _^_ES // words containing ñ are Spanish: senñor/-a/-ita

// punctuation
             !            _:eItrup_:
          !) !
             $            dOl@r
         __) - (_D        minWs
         A_) - (_D        _
         C_) - (_D        _
